Utah statutes.
62A-15-611.   Allocation of state hospital beds -- Formula.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Adult beds" means the total number of patient beds located in the adult
general psychiatric unit and the geriatric unit at the state hospital, as
determined by the superintendent of the state hospital.
(b)  "Mental health catchment area" means a county or group of counties
governed by a local mental health authority.
(2) (a)  The board shall establish by rule a formula to separately allocate to
local mental health authorities adult beds for persons who meet the
requirements of Subsection 62A-15-610(2)(a). Beginning on the effective date
of this act and until June 30, 2002, one hundred eighty two beds shall be
allocated to local mental health authorities under this section.
(b)  The number of beds shall be reviewed and adjusted as necessary:
(i)  on July 1, 2002, to restore the number of beds allocated to 212 beds as
funding permits; and
(ii)  every three years thereafter according to the state's population.
(c)  All population figures utilized shall reflect the most recent available
population estimates from the Utah Population Estimates Committee.
(3)  The formula established under Subsection (2) shall provide for allocation
of beds based on:
(a)  the percentage of the state's adult population located within a mental
health catchment area; and
(b)  a differential to compensate for the additional demand for hospital beds
in mental health catchment areas that are located in urban areas.
(4)  A local mental health authority may sell or loan its allocation of beds
to another local mental health authority.
(5)  The division shall allocate adult beds at the state hospital to local
mental health authorities for their use in accordance with the formula
established under this section.  If a local mental health authority is unable
to access a bed allocated to it under the formula established under Subsection
(2), the division shall provide that local mental health authority with
funding equal to the reasonable, average daily cost of an acute care bed
purchased by the local mental health authority.
(6)  The board shall periodically review and make changes in the formula
established under Subsection (2) as necessary to accurately reflect changes in
population.
